District of Columbia statutes.
1-611.52

Composition and term.

(a)

The Commission shall consist of 5 voting members and one nonvoting member as follows:

(1)

Two members appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council;

(2)

Three members appointed by the Council by resolution; and

(3)

The Director of the Office of Personnel, or his or her designee, as an ex officio nonvoting member.

(b)

The Chairperson of the Commission shall be selected the voting members.

(c)

Commission members shall serve a 3-year term; except, that the terms shall be staggered such that the first member appointed by the Mayor shall serve a one-year term and the first 2 members appointed by the Council shall each serve a 2-year term, with all other and subsequent appointments serving a 3-year term. A member is eligible for reappointment.

(d)

(1)

Commission members shall be private citizens generally recognized for their knowledge and experience in management and compensation and have been residents of the District for at least 5 years.

(2)

The Mayor, members of the Council, and officers and employees of the District of Columbia or the federal government shall not be eligible for appointment to the Commission.

(e)

The Commission shall establish rules and procedures as the Commission shall determine.

(f)

Any vacancy on the Commission shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. A person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve the remainder of the unexpired term of the original appointee.

(g)

All members of the Commission shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed for reasonable actual expenses incurred in the performance of official duties, pursuant to rules issued by the Mayor in accordance with § 1-611.08.

Mar 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1152
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-295, § 2(b), 54 DCR 1092